California statutes. Public Resources Code
 Development Financing Authority, the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, and the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority to raise funds to enable the commission to make loans to eligible institutions.

(4) Enter into loan agreements or other contracts necessary or appropriate in connection with the pledge or sale of loans pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3), or the borrowing of money as provided in paragraph (1), containing any provisions that may be required by the California Economic Development Financing Authority, the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, or the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority as conditions of issuing bonds to fund loans to, or the purchase of loans from, the commission.

(b) In connection with the pledging of loans, or of the principal and interest payment on loans,
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the commission may enter into pledge agreements setting forth the terms and conditions pursuant to which the commission is pledging loans or the principal and interest payment on loans, including the pledging of loans or the principal and interest payment on loans as collateral to secure the repayment of bonds or other borrowings by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, and may also agree to have the loans held by bond trustees or by independent collateral or escrow agents and to direct that payments received on those loans be paid to those trustee, collateral, or escrow agents.

(c) The commission may employ financial consultants, legal advisers, accountants, and
 other service providers, as may be necessary in its judgment, in connection with activities pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter provides a complete, separate, additional, and alternative method for implementing the measures authorized by this chapter, including the authority of the eligible institutions or local jurisdictions to have borrowed and to borrow in the future pursuant to loans made pursuant to this chapter or former Chapter 5.4 (commencing with Section 25440), and is supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (SB 1207)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25418.

The Department of Finance, at its discretion, may audit the expenditure of any allocation made pursuant to this chapter or the computation of any payment made pursuant to Section 25415.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1124.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25419.

In addition to the powers specifically granted to the commission by the other provisions of this chapter, the commission shall have the following powers:

(a) To establish qualifications and priorities, consistent with the objectives of this chapter, for making allocations.

(b) To establish such procedures and policies as may be necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1124.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25420.

The commission may expend from the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account an amount to pay for the actual administrative costs incurred by the commission pursuant to this chapter. The amount shall not exceed 5 percent of the annual unencumbered balance in the account as determined by the commission on July 1 of each fiscal year, to be used to defray costs incurred by the commission for allocations made by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 14.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25421.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(b) Except as specified in subdivisions (c) and (d), all loans outstanding as of January 1, 2028, shall continue to be repaid on a semiannual basis, as specified in Section 25415, until paid in full. All unexpended funds in the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account on January 1, 2028, and after that date, shall revert to the General Fund.

(c) To the extent required under applicable
 bond obligations, unexpended funds from the proceeds of bonds sold pursuant to Section 25417.5 that remain in the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account on January 1, 2028, shall remain in the account. These funds shall be expended pursuant to the applicable requirements for bond proceeds. Once all applicable bond obligations have been satisfied, unexpended funds shall revert to the General Fund.

(d) Unexpended funds from the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) remaining in the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account on January 1, 2028, shall revert to the Federal Trust Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   (SB 1207)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 5.2, comprising Sections 25410 to 25422.)
-------------------------------------------

25422.

(a) Federal funds available to the commission pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 25460) may be used by the commission to augment funding for grants and loans pursuant to this chapter. Any federal funds used for loans shall, when repaid, be deposited into the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account and used to make additional loans pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A separate subaccount shall be established within the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account to track the award and repayment of loans from federal funds, including any interest earnings, in accordance with the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may use loan repayments and all interest earnings on or accruing in the subaccount established pursuant to subdivision (b) for energy efficiency, energy conservation, renewable energy, and other energy-related projects and activities authorized by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 or subsequent federal acts related to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009. Unless prohibited by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, the commission may augment funding for any programs and measures authorized by this division.

(d) The commission shall transfer to the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund, established pursuant to Section 25471, the moneys remaining in the subaccount established pursuant to subdivision (b), including loan repayments and interest earnings that are
 deposited in the subaccount. The commission shall transfer the moneys not more frequently than annually and in an amount based on the balance in the subaccount at the time of transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 24, Sec. 34.   (SB 83)   Effective June 24, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.3. Energy Conservation Act of 2001 [25425. - 25436.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [25425. - 25426.]

25425.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Energy Conservation Act of 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25426.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Commercial refrigeration” means a refrigerator that is not a federally regulated consumer product.

(b) “Energy-efficient model” means any appliance that meets the efficiency standards of the United States Department of Energy that are effective on and after July 1, 2001, and, if applicable, products certified as energy efficient zone heating products by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(c) “Small business” means any small business as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Loans and Grants for Construction and Retrofit Projects [25433. - 25434.5.]

25433.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish incentives in the form of grants and loans to low-income residents, small businesses, and residential property owners for constructing and retrofitting buildings to be more energy efficient by using design elements, including, but not limited to, energy-efficient siding, insulation, products certified as energy efficient zone heating products by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, and double-paned windows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25433.5.

(a) In consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, the commission shall do both of the following for the purpose of full or partial funding of an eligible construction or retrofit project:

(1) Establish a grant program to provide financial assistance to eligible low-income individuals.

(2) Establish a 2-percent interest per annum loan program to provide financial assistance to a small business owner, residential property owner, or individual who is not eligible for a grant pursuant to paragraph (1). The loans shall be available to a small business owner who has a gross annual income that does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or to an individual or residential property owner who has a gross annual household income that does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) (1) The commission shall use the design guidelines adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14 of the act that added this section as standards to determine eligible energy-efficiency projects.

(2) The award of a grant pursuant to this section is subject to appeal to the commission upon a showing that the commission applied factors, other than those adopted by the commission, in making the award.

(3) The grant or loan recipient shall commit to using the grant or loan for the purpose for which the grant or loan was awarded.

(4) Any action taken by an applicant to apply for, or to become or remain eligible to receive, a grant award, including satisfying conditions specified by the commission, does not constitute the rendering of goods, services, or a direct benefit to the commission.

(5) The amount of any grant awarded pursuant to this article to a low-income individual does not constitute income for purposes of calculating the recipient’s gross income for the tax year during which the grant is received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 2.   Effective August 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25434.

The commission may contract with one or more business entities capable of supplying or providing goods or services necessary for the commission to carry out the responsibilities for the programs conducted pursuant to this article, and shall contract with one or more business entities to evaluate the effectiveness of the programs implemented pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25433.5. The commission may select an entity on a sole source basis for one or both of those purposes if the cost to the state will be reasonable and the commission determines that it is in the best interest of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25434.5.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Eligible construction or retrofit project” means a project for making improvements to a home or building in existence on the effective date of the act adding this section, through an addition, alteration, or repair, which effectively increases the energy efficiency or reduces the energy consumption of the home or building as specified by the commission’s guidelines under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14 of the act that added this section. The improvements shall be deemed to be cost-effective.

(b) “Low income” means an individual with a gross annual income equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(c) “Small business” means any small business as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 3.   Effective August 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Small Business Energy Efficient Refrigeration Loan Program [25435. - 25436.]

25435.

The commission shall administer the Small Business Energy Efficient Refrigeration Loan Program, as provided for in Section 25436.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25436.

(a) Within 45 days of the effective date of this chapter, the commission shall implement a Small Business Energy Efficient Refrigeration Loan Program for qualifying small businesses to purchase and install energy efficient refrigeration equipment.

(b) The program shall offer loans at 3 percent interest on terms that will ensure the small business owner will repay the loan over time in accordance with terms established by the Energy Commission, but in no event may the term exceed the useful life of the purchase.

(c) The commission may enter into agreements with lending institutions and qualifying vendors to facilitate making and administering loans. Any loan made by the commission for the purchase of equipment shall be secured against the equipment purchased.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grants [25450. - 25450.5.]

25450.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The cost of energy in California is increasing and creating greater demands on local governments’ operating budgets.

(2) The 110th Congress enacted the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17001 et seq.) that provides energy efficiency and conservation block grants to eligible entities, including states, to reduce fossil fuel emissions, improve energy efficiency, and reduce overall energy use.

(3) Section 545(c)(1)(A) of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17155(c)(1)(A)) mandates
 that states receiving block grants under the act use not less than 60 percent of the grant amount to provide subgrants to local governments that are not eligible entities for the purposes of the act.

(4) The 111th Congress enacted the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) that appropriates funds for energy efficiency and conservation, water conservation, home weatherization, green workforce development, and renewable energy.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to fully implement the requirements for, and achieve the purposes of, the energy and
 conservation block grants provided pursuant to the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 and the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), in the most expedient manner possible, and that the funds allocated to the state pursuant to those acts be administered by the commission.
 Moreover, to the extent possible without causing undue delay, the commission shall look to the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 and the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 programs and make policy decisions that leverage and maximize the use of these dollars, including, but not limited to, the areas of energy efficiency, renewable energy, water efficiency, weatherization, and green workforce development.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to strive to maximize the opportunity to allocate funds toward the most cost-effective energy efficiency projects, and when allocating funds toward administration, the commission should use the allowable administrative expenses specified in Section 545(c)(4) of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17155(c)(4)) as a ceiling and improve efficiencies to allocate less than the allowable
 amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 227, Sec. 2.   (AB 262)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25450.1.

The commission shall administer the funds allocated to and received by the state pursuant to the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17001 et seq.) and the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) for the Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant Program established pursuant to Section 542 of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17152), and may use the federal funds to award contracts, grants, and loans as expeditiously as possible consistent with those acts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 17.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25450.2.

(a) Not less than 60 percent of the funds received pursuant to Section 25450.1 shall be used to provide cost-effective energy efficiency, climate change planning, and conservation grants to cities with a population of less than 35,000 and counties with a population of less than 200,000, and be prioritized based on cost-effective energy efficiency. However, this population requirement does not apply to funds received pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(b) The remaining funds received pursuant to Section 25450.1 shall be used to provide cost-effective energy efficiency and conservation contracts, grants, and loans to eligible entities consistent with the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17001 et seq.) and the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) that govern or fund the Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant program and be prioritized based on cost-effective energy efficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 18.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25450.3.

The commission shall not exceed the amount specified in Section 545(c)(4) of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17155(c)(4)) for administrative expenses, which include, but are not limited to, reporting, recordkeeping, and evaluation activities required by the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Section 17001 et seq.), the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), and implementing regulations and guidelines, that govern or fund the Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant Program, and the combined administration program costs, indirect costs, overhead, and costs associated with the Statewide Cost Allocation Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 19.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25450.4.

The commission may award contracts, grants, and loans pursuant to this chapter, unless otherwise prohibited by the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17001 et seq.), the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), implementing regulations and guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 20.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25450.5.

(a) The commission may adopt guidelines governing the award, eligibility, and administration of funding pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) at a publicly noticed meeting offering all interested parties an opportunity to comment. The commission shall provide written public notice of not less than 30 days for the initial adoption of guidelines. Substantive changes to the guidelines shall not be adopted without 15-day written notice to the public. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Grants and loans made pursuant to this chapter are subject to appeal to the commission upon a showing that factors other than those described in the guidelines adopted by the commission were applied in making the awards and payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 21.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.6. Federal Funding of Energy-Related Projects and State Energy Programs [25460. - 25464.]

25460.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the 111th Congress enacted the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) that appropriates funds for various energy programs administered by the commission.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission should have the authority to award contracts, grants, and loans from funds received pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and to make the awards as expeditiously as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 22.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25461.

(a) Except as provided in Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 25450), the commission shall administer federal funds allocated to, and received by, the state for energy-related projects pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) or federal acts related to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) or subsequent federal acts related to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, the commission may use the federal funds to award contracts, grants, and loans, including loan guarantees, loan loss reserves, and credit
 enhancements, for energy efficiency, energy conservation, renewable energy, and other energy-related projects and activities authorized by the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 or subsequent federal acts related to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 718, Sec. 17.   (SB 855)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25462.

(a) The commission may adopt guidelines governing the award, eligibility, and administration of funding pursuant to this chapter at a publicly noticed meeting offering all interested parties an opportunity to comment. The commission shall provide written public notice of not less than 30 days for the initial adoption of guidelines. Substantive changes to the guidelines shall not be adopted without 15-day written notice to the public. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Grants and loans made pursuant to this chapter are subject to appeal to the commission upon a showing that factors other than those described in the guidelines adopted by the commission were applied in making the awards and payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 22.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25463.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, federal funds available to the commission pursuant to this chapter may be used by the commission to augment funding for any programs or measures authorized by this division unless otherwise prohibited by the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5). The commission may administer any funds used to augment other programs using the procedures of the augmented program consistent with applicable federal law.

(b) This section shall be liberally construed to maximize the commission’s ability to utilize and award federal funds expeditiously and in accordance with the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of
 2009 or federal acts related to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(c) (1) Of the moneys appropriated to the commission in the 2016–17 fiscal year from the moneys derived from the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 in the Federal Trust Fund for purposes authorized by Section 25461, the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) is hereby allocated for purposes consistent with subdivision (l) of Section 3823. No later than February 1, 2017, the commission shall issue a competitive solicitation for projects pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 3823 to be funded from this allocation.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, for the 2017–18 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter until all moneys in the Federal Trust Fund derived from the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 have
 been encumbered or expended, the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) annually is hereby continuously appropriated to the commission for the purposes authorized by Section 25461.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 539, Sec. 2.   (SB 1074)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25464.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Fund” means the Clean and Renewable Energy Business Financing Revolving Loan Fund.

(2) “Program” means the Clean and Renewable Energy Business Financing Revolving Loan Program.

(b) (1) The commission may use federal funds available pursuant to this chapter to implement the Clean and Renewable Energy Business Financing Revolving Loan Program to provide low interest loans to California clean and renewable energy manufacturing businesses.

(2) The commission may use other funding sources to leverage loans awarded under the program.

(c) The commission may work directly with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, the Treasurer, or any other state agency, board, commission, or authority to implement and administer the program, and may contract for private services as needed to implement the program.

(d) The commission may collect an application fee from applicants applying for funding under the program to help offset the costs of administering the program.

(e) (1) The Clean and Renewable Energy Business Financing Revolving Loan Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury to implement the program. The commission is authorized to administer the fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 13340
 of the Government Code, the money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the commission, without regard to fiscal years, to implement the program.

(2) Upon direction by the commission, the Controller shall create any accounts or subaccounts within the fund that the commission determines are necessary to facilitate management of the fund.

(3) The Controller shall disburse and receive moneys in the fund for purposes of the program and as authorized by the commission.

(4) All loans and repayments of loans made pursuant to this section, including interest payments, penalty payments, and all interest earning on or accruing to any moneys in the fund, shall be deposited in the fund and shall be available for the purposes of this section.

(5) The
 commission may expend up to 5 percent of moneys in the fund for its administrative costs to implement the program.

(f) Federal funds available to the commission pursuant to this chapter shall be transferred to the fund in the loan amounts when loans are awarded under the program by the commission.

(g) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (e), the commission may use loan repayments and all interest earnings on or accruing in the fund for energy efficiency, energy conservation, renewable energy, and other energy-related projects and activities authorized by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 or subsequent federal acts related to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009. Unless prohibited by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, the commission may augment funding for any programs and measures authorized by this
 division.

(h) The commission shall transfer to the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 25471 repayments of, and all accrued interest on, loans funded by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) pursuant to this section. The commission shall transfer the moneys not more frequently than annually and in an amount based on the balance in the fund at the time of transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 24, Sec. 35.   (SB 83)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.7. Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund and Energy Efficiency Retrofit State Revolving Fund [25470. - 25474.5.]

25470.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Act” means the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(b) “Allocation” means a loan of funds by the Department of General Services pursuant to the procedures specified in this chapter.

(c) “Building” means any existing structure that includes a heating or cooling system, or both. Additions to an existing building shall be considered part of that building rather than a separate building.

(d) “Department” means the Department of General Services.

(e) “Energy audit” means a determination of the energy consumption characteristics of a building that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies the type, size, and energy use level of the building and the major energy using systems of the building.

(2) Determines appropriate energy conservation maintenance and operating procedures.

(3) Indicates the need, if any, for the acquisition and installation of energy conservation measures.

(f) “Energy conservation maintenance and operating procedure” means a modification or modifications in the maintenance and operations of a building, and any installations therein, based on the use time schedule of the building that are designed to reduce energy
 consumption in the building and that require no significant expenditure of funds.

(g) “Energy conservation measure” means an installation or modification of an installation in a building that is primarily intended to reduce energy consumption or allow the use of a more cost-effective energy source.

(h) “Energy conservation project” means an undertaking to acquire and to install one or more energy conservation measures in a building, and technical assistance in connection with that undertaking.

(i) “Fund” means the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund or the Energy Efficiency Retrofit State Revolving Fund.

(j) “Project” means a purpose for which an allocation may be requested and made under this chapter. Those purposes shall include energy
 audits, energy conservation and operating procedures, and energy conservation measures in existing buildings, and energy conservation projects.

(k) “State agency” means a unit of state government, including any department, agency, board, or commission under the State of California.

(l) “State-owned building” means a building that is primarily occupied by offices or agencies of a unit of state government and includes those properties owned by the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 14.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25471.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund for the purpose of implementing this chapter. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in this fund is continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal years, for loans for projects on state-owned buildings and facilities to achieve greater, long-term energy efficiency, energy conservation, and energy cost and use avoidance.

(b) The fund shall be administered by the department. The department may use other funding sources to leverage project loans.

(c) For the 2009–10 fiscal year, the sum of twenty-five million
 dollars ($25,000,000) shall be transferred into the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund from money received by the commission pursuant to the act to be used for purposes of the federal State Energy Program.

(d) (1) For the 2011–12 and 2012–13 fiscal years, the commission may transfer up to fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), in total, as the commission determines to be appropriate, into the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund from money received by the commission pursuant to the act to be used for the purposes of the federal State Energy Program.

(2) The commission shall provide written notice to the Controller on the amount and timing of the transfer of moneys into the fund.

(3) Subject to the limitations of paragraph (1), the commission may make multiple transfers to
 allow for reallocating available funds from project cancellations and project savings.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 9795 of the Government Code, the commission shall notify, in writing, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee when a transfer is made pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) The Controller shall disburse moneys in the fund for the purposes of this chapter, as authorized by the department.

(f) Moneys in the fund, including all interest earnings, shall be clearly delineated and distinctly accounted for in accordance with the requirements of the act.

(g) Pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 25422 and subdivision (h) of Section 25464, the commission shall transfer to the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund repayments of, and all accrued
 interest on, loans funded by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 24, Sec. 36.   (SB 83)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

25471.5.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Energy Efficiency Retrofit State Revolving Fund for the purposes of implementing this chapter. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the Energy Efficiency Retrofit State Revolving Fund are continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal years for loans for projects in or on state-owned buildings and facilities to implement energy efficiency retrofit projects and to utilize renewable energy technology to achieve energy efficiency, reduce emissions of greenhouse gases, and reduce grid-based electricity purchases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 15.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25472.

(a) The department, in consultation with the commission, shall establish a process by which projects are identified and funding is allocated.

(b) The department shall use money in the fund for projects that will improve long-term energy efficiency and increase energy use savings.

(c) The department shall comply with the requirements of the act and implementing guidelines of the commission, including, but not limited to, performance metrics, data collection, and reporting. All projects shall be consistent with these requirements and guidelines.

(d) Funding
 prioritization shall be granted to those projects that are cost effective and will yield immediate and sustainable energy efficiency, energy conservation, energy use cost savings, and cost avoidance.

(e) The department shall fund allowable projects through a loan to the appropriate state agency or agencies occupying the building or facility for which the project will be performed.

(f) The department shall determine a reasonable loan repayment schedule that shall not exceed the life of the energy conservation measure equipment, as determined by the department, or the lease term of the building in which the energy conservation measure is installed.

(g) Maximum loan amounts shall be based on estimated energy cost savings that will allow state agencies to repay loan principal and interest within the maximum repayment
 term specified in this section.

(h) The department shall periodically set interest rates on the loans based on surveys of existing financial markets and at rates of not less than 1 percent per annum.

(i) Annual loan repayment amounts shall be structured so as to reflect the projected annualized energy cost avoidance estimated from the completed project. The department may utilize a direct billing methodology to recover loan repayments for completed projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 16.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25473.

(a) On or before January 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the department, in collaboration with the commission, shall submit to the Legislature’s fiscal and appropriate policy committees a report that includes an initial list of projects identified and planned for the 2009–10 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter. The report also shall include the anticipated cost of each project, an analysis of the results of the methodology, and an estimate of energy savings to be achieved.

(b) On or before July 1, 2010, the department, in collaboration with the commission, shall submit to the Legislature an update to the January 1, 2010, report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 23.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25474.

(a) Any repayment of loans made pursuant to this chapter from the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund, including interest payments, and all interest earnings on or accruing to, any money resulting from the implementation of this chapter in the Energy Efficient State Property Revolving Fund, shall be deposited in that fund and shall be available for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The department may recover costs of administering the projects and related costs through interest earnings up to 5 percent of the project loan amounts. Project costs can include energy efficiency improvements and costs associated with managing the project and administering the loan program,
 including all reporting requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 17.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25474.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 39718 of the Health and Safety Code, any repayment of loans made pursuant to this chapter from the Energy Efficiency Retrofit State Revolving Fund, including interest payments, and all interest earnings on or accruing to, any money resulting from the implementation of this chapter in the Energy Efficiency Retrofit State Revolving Fund, shall be deposited in that fund and shall be available for the purposes of this chapter.
